test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NID_VINIT_iiyaw_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px1iiyaw+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: niiiyawishinaanibaning
     +Px1iiyaw+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: niiiyawishinaanibanan
     +Px1iiyaw+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: niiiyawishinaanibanag
     +Px1iiyaw+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: niiiyawishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1iiyaw+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: niiiyawishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1iiyaw+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: niiiyawishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1iiyaw+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: niiiyawishiniibaning
     +Px1iiyaw+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: niiiyawishiniibanan
     +Px1iiyaw+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: niiiyawishiniibanag
     +Px1iiyaw+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: niiiyawishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1iiyaw+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: niiiyawishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1iiyaw+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: niiiyawishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1iiyaw+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: niiiyawishiwaaibaning
     +Px1iiyaw+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: niiiyawishiwaaibanan
     +Px1iiyaw+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: niiiyawishiwaaibanag
     +Px1iiyaw+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: niiiyawishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1iiyaw+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: niiiyawishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1iiyaw+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: niiiyawishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2iiyaw+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: giiiyawishinaanibaning
     +Px2iiyaw+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: giiiyawishinaanibanan
     +Px2iiyaw+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: giiiyawishinaanibanag
     +Px2iiyaw+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: giiiyawishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2iiyaw+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: giiiyawishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2iiyaw+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: giiiyawishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2iiyaw+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: giiiyawishiniibaning
     +Px2iiyaw+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: giiiyawishiniibanan
     +Px2iiyaw+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: giiiyawishiniibanag
     +Px2iiyaw+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: giiiyawishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2iiyaw+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: giiiyawishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2iiyaw+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: giiiyawishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2iiyaw+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: giiiyawishiwaaibaning
     +Px2iiyaw+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: giiiyawishiwaaibanan
     +Px2iiyaw+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: giiiyawishiwaaibanag
     +Px2iiyaw+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: giiiyawishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2iiyaw+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: giiiyawishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2iiyaw+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: giiiyawishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3iiyaw+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oiiyawishinaanibaning
     +Px3iiyaw+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oiiyawishinaanibanan
     +Px3iiyaw+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oiiyawishinaanibanag
     +Px3iiyaw+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oiiyawishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3iiyaw+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oiiyawishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3iiyaw+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oiiyawishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3iiyaw+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oiiyawishiniibaning
     +Px3iiyaw+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oiiyawishiniibanan
     +Px3iiyaw+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oiiyawishiniibanag
     +Px3iiyaw+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oiiyawishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3iiyaw+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oiiyawishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3iiyaw+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oiiyawishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3iiyaw+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oiiyawishiwaaibaning
     +Px3iiyaw+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oiiyawishiwaaibanan
     +Px3iiyaw+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oiiyawishiwaaibanag
     +Px3iiyaw+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oiiyawishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3iiyaw+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oiiyawishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3iiyaw+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oiiyawishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iiiyawishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iiiyawishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iiiyawishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iiiyawishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iiiyawishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iiiyawishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iiiyawishiniibaning
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iiiyawishiniibanan
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iiiyawishiniibanag
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iiiyawishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iiiyawishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iiiyawishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iiiyawishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iiiyawishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iiiyawishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iiiyawishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iiiyawishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefiiyaw+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iiiyawishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: iiyawenhimishinaaniban
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: iiyawenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: iiyawenhimishiniiban
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: iiyawenhimishini***idig, idog***
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: iiyawenhimishiwaaiban
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: iiyawenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: iiyawensimishinaaniban
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: iiyawensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: iiyawensimishiniiban
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: iiyawensimishini***idig, idog***
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: iiyawensimishiwaaiban
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: iiyawensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: iiyawenhimishinaaning
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: iiyawenhimishinaanan
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: iiyawenhimishinaanag
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: iiyawenhimishiniing
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: iiyawenhimishinian
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: iiyawenhimishiniag
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: iiyawenhimishiwaaing
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: iiyawenhimishiwaaan
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: iiyawenhimishiwaaag
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: iiyawensimishinaaning
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: iiyawensimishinaanan
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: iiyawensimishinaanag
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: iiyawensimishiniing
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: iiyawensimishinian
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: iiyawensimishiniag
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: iiyawensimishiwaaing
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: iiyawensimishiwaaan
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: iiyawensimishiwaaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: iiyawenhimishibaning
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: iiyawenhimishibanan
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: iiyawenhimishibanag
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: iiyawenhimish***idig, idog***ing
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: iiyawenhimish***idig, idog***an
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: iiyawenhimish***idig, idog***ag
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: iiyawensimishibaning
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: iiyawensimishibanan
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: iiyawensimishibanag
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: iiyawensimish***idig, idog***ing
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: iiyawensimish***idig, idog***an
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: iiyawensimish***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iiyawenhiminaanibaning
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iiyawenhiminaanibanan
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iiyawenhiminaanibanag
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iiyawenhiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iiyawenhiminaan***idig, idog***an
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iiyawenhiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iiyawenhiminiibaning
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iiyawenhiminiibanan
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iiyawenhiminiibanag
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iiyawenhimini***idig, idog***ing
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iiyawenhimini***idig, idog***an
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iiyawenhimini***idig, idog***ag
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iiyawenhimiwaaibaning
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iiyawenhimiwaaibanan
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iiyawenhimiwaaibanag
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iiyawenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iiyawenhimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     iiyaw+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iiyawenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iiyawensiminaanibaning
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iiyawensiminaanibanan
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iiyawensiminaanibanag
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iiyawensiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iiyawensiminaan***idig, idog***an
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iiyawensiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iiyawensiminiibaning
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iiyawensiminiibanan
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iiyawensiminiibanag
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iiyawensimini***idig, idog***ing
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iiyawensimini***idig, idog***an
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iiyawensimini***idig, idog***ag
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iiyawensimiwaaibaning
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iiyawensimiwaaibanan
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iiyawensimiwaaibanag
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iiyawensimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iiyawensimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     iiyaw+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iiyawensimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6, 7
     iiyaw+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iiyawenhishinaanibaning
     iiyaw+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iiyawenhishinaanibanan
     iiyaw+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iiyawenhishinaanibanag
     iiyaw+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iiyawenhishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     iiyaw+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iiyawenhishinaan***idig, idog***an
     iiyaw+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iiyawenhishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     iiyaw+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iiyawenhishiniibaning
     iiyaw+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iiyawenhishiniibanan
     iiyaw+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iiyawenhishiniibanag
     iiyaw+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iiyawenhishini***idig, idog***ing
     iiyaw+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iiyawenhishini***idig, idog***an
     iiyaw+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iiyawenhishini***idig, idog***ag
     iiyaw+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iiyawenhishiwaaibaning
     iiyaw+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iiyawenhishiwaaibanan
     iiyaw+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iiyawenhishiwaaibanag
     iiyaw+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iiyawenhishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     iiyaw+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iiyawenhishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     iiyaw+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iiyawenhishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     iiyaw+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iiyawensishinaanibaning
     iiyaw+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iiyawensishinaanibanan
     iiyaw+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iiyawensishinaanibanag
     iiyaw+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iiyawensishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     iiyaw+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iiyawensishinaan***idig, idog***an
     iiyaw+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iiyawensishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     iiyaw+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iiyawensishiniibaning
     iiyaw+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iiyawensishiniibanan
     iiyaw+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iiyawensishiniibanag
     iiyaw+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iiyawensishini***idig, idog***ing
     iiyaw+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iiyawensishini***idig, idog***an
     iiyaw+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iiyawensishini***idig, idog***ag
     iiyaw+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iiyawensishiwaaibaning
     iiyaw+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iiyawensishiwaaibanan
     iiyaw+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iiyawensishiwaaibanag
     iiyaw+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iiyawensishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     iiyaw+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iiyawensishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     iiyaw+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iiyawensishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
